fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-esa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - êsa - ok : # -m animate noun, clam AEW NA4
     êsa+N+A+Sg: êsa
     êsa+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitêsim
     êsa+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitêsim
     êsa+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitêsiminân
     êsa+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kitêsiminaw
     êsa+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitêsimiwâw

     êsa+N+A+Pl: êsak
     êsa+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitêsimak
     êsa+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitêsimak
     êsa+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitêsiminânak
     êsa+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kitêsiminawak
     êsa+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitêsimiwâwak
     
     êsa+N+A+Obv: êsa
     êsa+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitêsima
     êsa+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitêsima
     êsa+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitêsiminâna
     êsa+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kitêsiminawa
     êsa+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitêsimiwâwa
     êsa+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otêsima
     êsa+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otêsimiwâwa
     êsa+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otêsimiyiwa
     
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [êsis, êsisis]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nicêsimis, nicêsimisis]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kicêsimis, kicêsimisis]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nicêsimisinân, nicêsimisisinân]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kicêsimisinaw, kicêsimisisinaw]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kicêsimisiwâw, kicêsimisisiwâw]

     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [êsisak, êsisisak]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nicêsimisak, nicêsimisisak]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kicêsimisak, kicêsimisisak]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nicêsimisinânak, nicêsimisisinânak]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kicêsimisinawak, kicêsimisisinawak]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kicêsimisiwâwak, kicêsimisisiwâwak]
     
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocêsimisa, ocêsimisisa]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocêsimisiwâwa, ocêsimisisiwâwa]
     êsa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ocêsimisiyiwa, ocêsimisisiyiwa]
